Arkansas, session 2025, HB1404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-518. Contributions to pregnancy resource center — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Contribution" means a donation of cash, stock, bonds, or
other marketable securities or real property;
(2) "Pregnancy resource center” means an organization that:
(i) Seeks to provide a range of services to
individuals facing an unintended pregnancy with the intention of encouraging
pregnant women to give birth to their unborn children; and
(ii) Does not:
(a) Perform, prescribe, encourage, or provide
referrals for abortions; or
(b) Affiliate with an organization that
performs, prescribes, encourages, or provides referrals for abortions; and
(3) "Taxpayer" means a natural person who is subject to or
liable for the income tax imposed under this chapter.
(i) (b) There is allowed an income tax credit against
*JLL146*
04-03-2025 11:47:42 JLL146

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1404
the income tax imposed by this chapter in the amount equal to fifty percent
(50%) of the total amount of contributions a taxpayer made to a pregnancy
resource center during the tax year.
(c) The amount of the income tax credit under this section that may be
claimed by the taxpayer in a tax year shall not exceed the amount of income
tax due by the taxpayer.
(d) A contribution for which an income tax credit is claimed under
this section is not deductible or otherwise permitted to offset any other
income from the tax year in which the contribution was made.
(e) The Department of Finance and Administration may promulgate rules
necessary to implement this section.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/C. Cooper




















04-03-2025 11:47:42 JLL146